Wisconsin, session 2025, SB126.
do enact as follows:SB126,11Section 1. 2023 Wisconsin Act 126, section 35 (1) is renumbered 2023 2Wisconsin Act 126, section 35 and amended to read:SB126,2,43[2023 Wisconsin Act 126] Section 35 This act takes effect on July 1, 2025., 4except as follows:SB126,25Section 2. 2023 Wisconsin Act 126, section 35 (1m) is created to read:SB126,2,116[2023 Wisconsin Act 126] Section 35 (1m) The treatment of ss. 5.02 (4v), 711.0101 (1) (a) 1. and 2., (14), and (34), 11.0102 (title), (1), (2) (a) and (b), and (3), 811.0103 (1) (b) and (3) (b), 11.0104 (1) (a) and (d) and (2), 11.0105 (1) (a), 11.0202 (1) 9(a), 11.0203 (1) (c), 11.0204 (7), 11.0304 (7), 11.0404 (4), 11.1101 (1) (h) 2., (2) (h) 2., 10(3) (k) 2., and (4) (k) 2., 11.1106 (3), 11.1201, 11.1304 (1), (5), and (6) (a), 202.12 (5) 11(a) 2., 755.01 (2) and (4), and 940.20 (4m) takes effect on December 1, 2027.SB126,2,1212